Hawaii, session 2026, GM1181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. Section 76-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The civil service to which this chapter applies shall
comprise all positions in the State now existing or hereafter
established and embrace all personal services performed for the
State, except the following:
(1) Commissioned and enlisted personnel of the Hawaii
National Guard and positions in the Hawaii National
Guard that are required by state or federal laws or
regulations or orders of the National Guard to be
filled from those commissioned or enlisted personnel;
(2) Positions filled by persons employed by contract where
the director of human resources development has
certified that the service is special or unique or is
essential to the public interest and that, because of
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx
niiiiiMimiiiHiiiiiiiiiH

Page 2 S.B. NO. S’l
C.D. 1
circLimstances surrounding its fulfillment, personnel
to perform the service cannot be obtained through
normal civil service recruitment procedures. Any
contract may be for any period not exceeding one year;
(3) Positions that must be filled without delay to comply
with a court order or decree if the director
determines that recruitment through normal recruitment
civil service procedures would result in delay or
noncompliance, such as the Felix-Cayetano consent
decree;
(4) Positions filled by the legislature or by either house
or any committee thereof;
(5) Employees in the office of the governor and office of
the lieutenant governor, and household employees at
Washington Place;
(6) Positions filled by popular vote;
(7) Department heads, officers, and members of any board,
commission, or other state agency whose appointments
are made by the governor or are required by law to be
confirmed by the senate;
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 2
iiHiiiiMiiNiimni

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(8) Judges, referees, receivers, masters, jurors, notaries
public, land court examiners, court commissioners, and
attorneys appointed by a state court for a special
temporary service;
(9) One bailiff for the chief justice of the supreme court
who shall have the powers and duties of a court
officer and bailiff under section 606-14; one
secretary or clerk for each justice of the supreme
court, each judge of the intermediate appellate court,
and each judge of the circuit court; one secretary for
the judicial council; one deputy administrative
director of the courts; three law clerks for the chief
justice of the supreme court, two law clerks for each
associate justice of the supreme court and each judge
of the intermediate appellate court, one law clerk for
each judge of the circuit court, two additional law
clerks for the civil administrative judge of the
circuit court of the first circuit, two additional law
clerks for the criminal administrative judge of the
circuit court of the first circuit, one additional law
clerk for the senior judge of the family court of the
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 3
lillMDIIRIIiniliMIH

Page 4 S.B. NO. S’,
C.D. 1
first circuit, two additional law clerks for the civil
motions judge of the circuit court of the first
circuit, two additional law clerks for the criminal
motions judge of the circuit court of the first
circuit, and two law clerks for the administrative
judge of the district court of the first circuit; and
one private secretary for the administrative director
of the courts, the deputy administrative director of
the courts, each department head, each deputy or first
assistant, and each additional deputy, or assistant
deputy, or assistant defined in paragraph (16);
(10) First deputy and deputy attorneys general, the
administrative services manager of the department of
the attorney general, one secretary for the
administrative services manager, an administrator and
any support staff for the criminal and juvenile
justice resources coordination functions, and law
clerks;
(11) (A) Teachers, principals, vice-principals, complex
area superintendents, deputy and assistant
superintendents, other certificated personnel.
2026-2469 SB3069 GDI SMA.docx 4
MIIIWlUIMmilHIlillHI

Page 5 3069
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
and no more than twenty noncertificated
administrative, professional, and technical
personnel not engaged in instructional work;
(B) Effective July 1, 2003, teaching assistants.
educational assistants. bilingual or bicultural
school-home assistants, school psychologists,
psychological examiners, speech pathologists.
athletic health care trainers, alternative school
work study assistants, alternative school
educational or supportive services specialists,
alternative school project coordinators, and
communications aides in the department of
education;
(C) The special assistant to the state librarian and
one secretary for the special assistant to the
state librarian; and
(D) Members of the faculty of the university of
Hawaii, including research workers, extension
agents, personnel engaged in instructional work.
and administrative, professional, and technical
personnel of the university;
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 5
IIIIIHIIIilliUlllllMillinilll

Page 6
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(12) Employees engaged in special, research, or
demonstration projects approved by the governor;
(13) (A) Positions filled by inmates, patients of state
institutions, and persons with severe physical or
mental disabilities participating in the wor)<
experience training programs;
(B) Positions filled with students in accordance with
guidelines for established state employment
programs; and
(C) Positions that provide worlc experience training
or temporary public service employment that are
filled by persons entering the workforce or
persons transitioning into other careers under
programs such as the federal Workforce Investment
Act of 1998, as amended, or the Senior Community
Service Employment Program of the Employment and
Training Administration of the United States
Department of Labor, or under other similar state
programs;
(14) A custodian or guide at lolani Palace, the Royal
Mausoleum, and Hulihee Palace;
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiiiiiniiiiinHiiiiB

Page 7
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(15) Positions filled by persons employed on a fee,
contract, or piecework basis, who may lawfully perform
their duties concurrently with their private business
or profession or other private employment and whose
duties require only a portion of their time, if it is
impracticable to ascertain or anticipate the portion
of time to be devoted to the service of the State;
(16) Positions of first deputies or first assistants of
each department head appointed under or in the manner
provided in section 6, article V, of the Hawaii State
Constitution; three additional deputies or assistants
either in charge of the highways, harbors, and
airports divisions or other functions within the
department of transportation as may be assigned by the
director of transportation, with the approval of the
governor; one additional deputy in the department of
human services either in charge of welfare or other
functions within the department as may be assigned by
the director of human services; four additional
deputies in the department of health, each in charge
of one of the following: behavioral health.
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 7
iHHiiHiiininiHigiiiiiBHi

Page 8
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
environmental health, hospitals, and health resources
administration, including other functions within the
department as may be assigned by the director of
health, with the approval of the governor; two
additional deputies in charge of the law enforcement
programs, administration, or other functions within
the department of law enforcement as may be assigned
by the director of law enforcement, with the approval
of the governor; three additional deputies each in
charge of the correctional institutions,
rehabilitation services and programs, and
administration or other functions within the
department of corrections and rehabilitation as may be
assigned by the director of corrections and
rehabilitation, with the approval of the governor; two
administrative assistants to the state librarian; and
an administrative assistant to the superintendent of
education;
(17) Positions specifically exempted from this part by any
other law; provided that:
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 8
l■llllllllUill■lllNnlOli

Page 9
S.B. NO. S?!
C.D. 1
(A) Any exemption created after July 1, 2014, shall
expire three years after its enactment unless
affirmatively extended by an act of the
legislature; and
(B) All of the positions defined by paragraph (9)
shall be included in the position classification
plan;
(18) Positions in the state foster grandparent program and
positions for temporary employment of senior citizens
in occupations in which there is a severe personnel
shortage or in special projects;
(19) Household employees at the official residence of the
president of the university of Hawaii;
(20) Employees in the department of education engaged in
the supervision of students during meal periods in the
distribution, collection, and counting of meal
ticlcets, and in the cleaning of classrooms after
school hours on a less than half-time basis;
(21) Employees hired under the tenant hire program of the
Hawaii public housing authority; provided that no more
than twenty-six per cent of the authority's wor)<force
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx
miiiiHiiiiiniiiiiiiiiwiii

Page 10
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
in any housing project maintained or operated by the
authority shall be hired under the tenant hire
program;
(22) Positions of the federally funded expanded food and
nutrition program of the university of Hawaii that
require the hiring of nutrition program assistants who
live in the areas they serve;
(23) Positions filled by persons with severe disabilities
who are certified by the state vocational
rehabilitation office that they are able to perform
safely the duties of the positions;
(24) The sheriff;
(25) A gender and other fairness coordinator hired by the
judiciary;
(26) Positions in the Hawaii National Guard youth and adult
education programs;
(27) In the Hawaii state energy office in the department of
business, economic development, and tourism, all
energy program managers, energy program specialists,
energy program assistants, and energy analysts;
2026-2469 SB3069 GDI SMA.docx 10
MllliniiliDlVMinilllHM

Page 11 3069
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(28) Administrative appeals hearing officers in the
department of human services;
(29) In the [Me4-QyBS¥] med-QUEST division of the
department of human services, the division
administrator, finance officer, health care services
branch administrator, medical director, and clinical
standards administrator;
(30) In the director's office of the department of human
services, the enterprise officer, information security
and privacy compliance officer, security and privacy
compliance engineer, security and privacy compliance
analyst, information technology implementation
manager, assistant information technology
implementation manager, resource manager, community or
project development director, policy director, special
assistant to the director, and limited English
proficiency project manager or coordinator;
(31) The Alzheimer's disease and related dementia services
coordinator in the executive office on aging;
(32) In the Hawaii emergency management agency, the
executive officer, public information officer, civil
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx
imoiiiHiiiiiHiniiiiHii

Page 12
S.B. NO.
• H.D. 1
C.D. 1
defense administrative officer, branch chiefs, and
emergency operations center state warning point
personnel; provided that for state warning point
personnel, the director shall determine that
recruitment through normal civil service recruitment
procedures would result in delay or noncompliance;
(33) The executive director and seven full-time
administrative positions of the school facilities
authority;
(34) Positions in the Mauna Kea stewardship and oversight ■
authority;
(35) In the office of homeland security of the department
of law enforcement, the statewide interoperable
communications coordinator;
(36) In the social services division of the department of
human services, the business technology analyst;
(37) The executive director and staff of the 911 board;
(38) The software developer supervisor and senior software
developers in the department of taxation;
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 12
IHHWIiiHIIWIIIiniHMII

Page 13 S.B. NO. S?!
C.D. 1
(39) In the department of law enforcement, five Commission
on Accreditation for Law Enforcement Agencies, Inc.,
coordinator positions;
(40) The state fire marshal and deputy state fire marshal
in the office of the state fire marshal;
(41) The administrator for the law enforcement standards
board;
(42) In the office of the director of taxation, the data
privacy officer and tax business analysts; and
[+] (43) [-flAll positions filled by the Hawaii tourism authority
within the department of business, economic
development, and tourism[t]; and
(44) All positions within the comptroller's office filled
to support communications, change management, and
business process improvement programs as part of the
State's information technology modernization efforts.
The director shall determine the applicability of this
section to specific positions.
Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the civil
service status of any incumbent as it existed on July 1, 1955."
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 13
iiiMHiiliiniHiinunin

Page 14 S.B. NO. 25*1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. The department of accounting and general
services shall submit a report to the legislature no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session, on:
(1) The number and titles of the positions established and
filled pursuant to sections 26-6(b)(9) and 76-
16(b) (44), Hawaii Revised Statutes; and
(2) Projects on which these employees are actively
working.
PART II
SECTION 3. Section 26-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The department shall:
(1) Preaudit and conduct after-the-fact audits of the
financial accounts of all state departments to
determine the legality of expenditures and the
accuracy of accounts;
(2) Report to the governor and to each regular session of
the legislature as to the finances of each department
of the State;
(3) Administer the state risk management program;
(4) Establish and manage motor pools;
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 14
IliillllilllllllllllOMM

Page 15 3069
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(5) Manage the preservation and disposal of all records of
the State;
(6) Undertake the program of centralized engineering and
office leasing services, including operation and
maintenance and lease buyback processing pursuant to
subsection (d) of public buildings, for departments of
the State;
(7) Undertake the functions of the state surveyor;
(8) Establish accounting and internal control systems;
(9) Have the discretion to employ persons within the
comptroller's office who shall be exempt from chapters
76 and 89 in support of communications, change
management, and business process improvement programs
as part of the State's information technology
modernization efforts; provided that the persons shall
be members of the state employees' retirement system
and shall be eligible to receive the benefits of any
state employee benefit program generally applicable to
officers and employees of the State;
(10) Have the discretion to establish and fill not more
than three full-time equivalent positions within the
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 15

Page 16 S.B. NO. sT,
C.D. 1
gub2A£-J!^°£lSS d2^y2^s iorV.s^pecia]^£roje^t^ranch t2i^
shaJJ^be exem£t^rOTn cha£ter^7 6 an^89 as£a^t^of y^
State's efforts to undertake unique and specialized
public works projects; provided that the persons
employed shall be members of the state employees'
retirement system and shall be eligible to receive the
benefits of any state employee benefit program
generally applicable to officers and employees of the
State;
[ (l-Q-) ] (11) Provide centralized computer information
management and processing services through the chief
information officer;
[(11)] (12) Establish a program to provide a means for
public access to public information and develop an
information network for state government;
[-(42) ] (13) Assume administrative responsibility for the
office of information practices; and
[-(44-)-] (14) Approve state fleet acquisitions; provided that:
(A) Beginning January 1, 2022, all new light-duty
motor vehicles that are passenger cars purchased
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 16
iiiliiiHiiiHniHiMiiniii

Page 17
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
for the State's fleet shall be zero-emission
vehicles;
(B) Beginning as soon as practicable but no later
than January 1, 2030, all new light-duty motor
vehicles that are multipurpose passenger vehicles
and trucks for the State's fleet shall be zero­
emission vehicles; and
(C) The comptroller may authorize an exemption for
new fleet vehicle purchases if zero-emission
vehicles are demonstrated to be cost-prohibitive
on a lifecycle basis or unsuitable for the
vehicles' planned purpose, or if funds are
unavailable.
For the purposes of this subsection:
"Light-duty motor vehicle" has the same meaning as defined
in title 10 Code of Federal Regulations part 490.
"Multipurpose passenger vehicle" has the same meaning as
defined in title 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 571.3,
"Passenger car" has the same meaning as defined in title 49
Code of Federal Regulations section 571.3.
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 17
■HiiiHiiiiHiinHiin

Page 18 3069
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
"Truck" has the same meaning as defined in title 49 Code of
Federal Regulations section 571.3.
"Zero-emission vehicle" has the same meaning as specified
in title 40 Code of Federal Regulations section 88.1."
SECTION 4. Section 76-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The civil service to which this chapter applies shall
comprise all positions in the State now existing or hereafter
established and embrace all personal services performed for the
State, except the following:
(1) Commissioned and enlisted personnel of the Hawaii
National Guard and positions in the Hawaii National
Guard that are required by state or federal laws or
regulations or orders of the National Guard to be
filled from those commissioned or enlisted personnel;
(2) Positions filled by persons employed by contract where
the director of human resources development has
certified that the service is special or unique or is
essential to the public interest and that, because of
circumstances surrounding its fulfillment, personnel
to perform the service cannot be obtained through
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 18
iininiiHMiffliMinn

Page 19
S B. NO. sT,
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
normal civil service recruitment procedures. Any
contract may be for any period not exceeding one year;
(3) Positions that must be filled without delay to comply
with a court order or decree if the director
determines that recruitment through normal recruitment
civil service procedures would result in delay or
noncompliance, such as the Felix-Cayetano consent
decree;
(4) Positions filled by the legislature or by either house
or any committee thereof;
(5) Employees in the office of the governor and office of
the lieutenant governor, and household employees at
Washington Place;
(6) Positions filled by popular vote;
(7) Department heads, officers, and members of any board,
commission, or other state agency whose appointments
are made by the governor or are required by law to be
confirmed by the senate;
(8) Judges, referees, receivers, masters, jurors, notaries
public, land court examiners, court commissioners, and
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 19

Page 20
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
attorneys appointed by a state court for a special
temporary service;
(9) One bailiff for the chief justice of the supreme court
who shall have the powers and duties of a court
officer and bailiff under section 606-14; one
secretary or clerk for each justice of the supreme
court, each judge of the intermediate appellate court,
and each judge of the circuit court; one secretary for
the judicial council; one deputy administrative
director of the courts; three law clerks for the chief
justice of the supreme court, two law clerks for each
associate justice of the supreme court and each judge
of the intermediate appellate court, one law clerk for
each judge of the circuit court, two additional law
clerks for the civil administrative judge of the
circuit court of the first circuit, two additional law
clerks for the criminal administrative judge of the
circuit court of the first circuit, one additional law
clerk for the senior judge of the family court of the
first circuit, two additional law clerks for the civil
motions judge of the circuit court of the first
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 20
iniHMIIIIIHIIIHIIIIIIIIIIII

Page 21
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
circuit, two additional law clerks for the criminal
motions judge of the circuit court of the first
circuit, and two law clerks for the administrative
judge of the district court of the first circuit; and
one private secretary for the administrative director
of the courts, the deputy administrative director of
the courts, each department head, each deputy or first
assistant, and each additional deputy, or assistant
deputy, or assistant defined in paragraph (16);
(10) First deputy and deputy attorneys general, the
administrative services manager of the department of
the attorney general, one secretary for the
administrative services manager, an administrator and
any support staff for the criminal and juvenile
justice resources coordination functions, and law
clerks;
(11) (A) Teachers, principals, vice-principals, complex
area superintendents, deputy and assistant
superintendents, other certificated personnel,
and no more than twenty noncertificated
2026-2469 SB3069 GDI SMA.docx 21

Page 22 S.B. NO. S?i
C.D. 1
administrative, professional, and technical
personnel not engaged in instructional work;
(B) Effective July 1, 2003, teaching assistants,
educational assistants, bilingual or bicultural
school-home assistants, school psychologists,
psychological examiners, speech pathologists,
athletic health care trainers, alternative school
work study assistants, alternative school
educational or supportive services specialists,
alternative school project coordinators, and
communications aides in the department of
education;
(C) The special assistant to the state librarian and
one secretary for the special assistant to the
state librarian; and
(D) Members of the faculty of the university of
Hawaii, including research workers, extension
agents, personnel engaged in instructional work,
and administrative, professional, and technical
personnel of the university;
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 22

Page 23 3069
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
CD. 1
(12) Employees engaged in special, research, or
demonstration projects approved by the governor;
(13) (A) Positions filled by inmates, patients of state
institutions, and persons with severe physical or
mental disabilities participating in the work
experience training programs;
(B) Positions filled with students in accordance with
guidelines for established state employment
programs; and
(C) Positions that provide work experience training
or temporary public service employment that are
filled by persons entering the workforce or
persons transitioning into other careers under
programs such as the federal Workforce Investment
Act of 1998, as amended, or the Senior Community
Service Employment Program of the Employment and
Training Administration of the United States
Department of Labor, or under other similar state
programs;
(14) A custodian or guide at lolani Palace, the Royal
Mausoleum, and Hulihee Palace;
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 23
IRIIOUiniiiniilMIMH

Page 24 3069
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(15) Positions filled by persons employed on a fee,
contract, or piecework, basis, who may lawfully perform
their duties concurrently with their private business
or profession or other private employment and whose
duties require only a portion of their time, if it is
impracticable to ascertain or anticipate the portion
of time to be devoted to the service of the State;
(16) Positions of first deputies or first assistants of
each department head appointed under or in the manner
provided in section 6, article V, of the Hawaii State
Constitution; three additional deputies or assistants
either in charge of the highways, harbors, and
airports divisions or other functions within the
department of transportation as may be assigned by the
director of transportation, with the approval of the
governor; one additional deputy in the department of
human services either in charge of welfare or other
functions within the department as may be assigned by
the director of human services; four additional
deputies in the department of health, each in charge
of one of the following: behavioral health.
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 24

Page 25
S.B. NO. sr',
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
environmental health, hospitals, and health resources
administration, including other functions within the
department as may be assigned by the director of
health, with the approval of the governor; two
additional deputies in charge of the law enforcement
programs, administration, or other functions within
the department of law enforcement as may be assigned
by the director of law enforcement, with the approval
of the governor; three additional deputies each in
charge of the correctional institutions,
rehabilitation services and programs, and
administration or other functions within the
department of corrections and rehabilitation as may be
assigned by the director of corrections and
rehabilitation, with the approval of the governor; two
administrative assistants to the state librarian; and
an administrative assistant to the superintendent of
education;
(17) Positions specifically exempted from this part by any
other law; provided that:
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 25
iHniiiniHiiHiiiiiiii

Page 26 S.B. NO. sT,
C.D. 1
(A) Any exemption created after July 1, 2014, shall
expire three years after its enactment unless
affirmatively extended by an act of the
legislature; and
(B) All of the positions defined by paragraph (9)
shall be included in the position classification
plan;
(18) Positions in the state foster grandparent program and
positions for temporary employment of senior citizens
in occupations in which there is a severe personnel
shortage or in special projects;
(19) Household employees at the official residence of the
president of the university of Hawaii;
(20) Employees in the department of education engaged in
the supervision of students during meal periods in the
distribution, collection, and counting of meal
tickets, and in the cleaning of classrooms after
school hours on a less than half-time basis;
(21) Employees hired under the tenant hire program of the
Hawaii public housing authority; provided that no more
than twenty-six per cent of the authority’s workforce
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 26
imniianiMDiginiiiiiii

Page 27
S.B. NO. ““
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
in any housing project maintained or operated by the
authority shall be hired under the tenant hire
program;
(22) Positions of the federally funded expanded food and
nutrition program of the university of Hawaii that
require the hiring of nutrition program assistants who
live in the areas they serve;
(23) Positions filled by persons with severe disabilities
who are certified by the state vocational
rehabilitation office that they are able to perform
safely the duties of the positions;
(24) The sheriff;
(25) A gender and other fairness coordinator hired by the
judiciary;
(26) Positions in the Hawaii National Guard youth and adult
education programs;
(27) In the Hawaii state energy office in the department of
business, economic development, and tourism, all
energy program managers, energy program specialists,
energy program assistants, and energy analysts;
2026-2469 SB3069 GDI SMA.docx 27
ininniiiiiiiniiiiiiMiin

Page 28 S.B. NO. S?,
C.D. 1
(28) Administrative appeals hearing officers in the
department of human services;
(29) In the [Med—med-QUEST division of the
department of human services, the division
administrator, finance officer, health care services
branch administrator, medical director, and clinical
standards administrator;
(30) In the director's office of the department of human
services, the enterprise officer, information security
and privacy compliance officer, security and privacy
compliance engineer, security and privacy compliance
analyst, information technology implementation
manager, assistant information technology
implementation manager, resource manager, community or
project development director, policy director, special
assistant to the director, and limited English
proficiency project manager or coordinator;
(31) The Alzheimer's disease and related dementia services
coordinator in the executive office on aging;
(32) In the Hawaii emergency management agency, the
executive officer, public information officer, civil
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 2
IfflIMfflIIMIIillHIlUIIIM

Page 29
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
defense administrative officer, branch chiefs, and
emergency operations center state warning point
personnel; provided that for state warning point
personnel, the director shall determine that
recruitment through normal civil service recruitment
procedures would result in delay or noncompliance;
(33) The executive director and seven full-time
administrative positions of the school facilities
authority;
(34) Positions in the Mauna Kea stewardship and oversight
authority;
(35) In the office of homeland security of the department
of law enforcement, the statewide interoperable
communications coordinator;
(36) In the social services division of the department of
human services, the business technology analyst;
(37) The executive director and staff of the 911 board;
(38) The software developer supervisor and senior software
developers in the department of taxation;
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 29

Page 30
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(39) In the department of law enforcement, five Commission
on Accreditation for Law Enforcement Agencies, Inc.,
coordinator positions;
(40) The state fire marshal and deputy state fire marshal
in the office of the state fire marshal;
(41) The administrator for the law enforcement standards
board;
(42) In the office of the director of taxation, the data
privacy officer and tax business analysts; [eftd
[+1 (43) [4-]All positions filled by the Hawaii tourism authority
within the department of business, economic
development, and tourism[—]£
(44) All positions within the comptroller's office filled
to support communications, change management, and
business process improvement programs as part of the
State's information technology modernization efforts;
and
(45) Three full-time positions filled by the public works
division's special project branch within the
department of accounting and general services as part
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 30
HlillllHIIHIDIHIIIIIIIi

Page 31
S.B. NO. S?,
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
of the State's efforts to undertake unique and
specialized public works projects.
The director shall determine the applicability of this
section to specific positions.
Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the civil
service status of any incumbent as it existed on July 1, 1955."
SECTION 5. The department of accounting and general
services shall submit a report to the legislature no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of
2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, and 2031, on:
(1) The number and titles of the positions established and
filled pursuant to sections 26-6(b)(10) and
76-16(b)(45), Hawaii Revise Statutes; and
(2) Projects on which these employees are actively
working.
PART III
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026;
provided that part II of this Act shall take effect on July 2,
2026, and shall be repealed on December 31, 2031, and sections
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 31

Page 32 3069
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
CD. 1
26-6 and 76-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in
the form in which it read on the day prior to the effective date
of that part.
2026-2469 SB3069 CDl SMA.docx 32

S.B. NO.
^*1
■ • h.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 4th day of June , 2026
GOVEF^OR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 3069, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
122-26

SB No. 3069, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives